Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202517-1001
Suburban development; zoning ordinances; building regulations; public utility codes; applicability to extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction; notice to county board.

(1) Except as provided in section 13-327 and subsection (2) of this section, the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of a city of the second class or village shall consist of the unincorporated area one mile beyond and adjacent to its corporate boundaries.

(2) For purposes of sections 70-1001 to 70-1020, the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of a city of the second class or village shall consist of the unincorporated area one-half mile beyond and adjacent to its corporate boundaries.

(3) Any city of the second class or village may apply by ordinance any existing or future zoning regulations, property use regulations, building ordinances, electrical ordinances, and plumbing ordinances within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, with the same force and effect as if such area was within its corporate limits. No such ordinance shall be extended or applied so as to prohibit, prevent, or interfere with the conduct of existing farming, livestock operations, businesses, or industry. The fact that the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction or part thereof is located in a different county or counties than some or all portions of the municipality shall not be construed as affecting the powers of the city or village to apply such ordinances.

(4)(a) Any city of the second class or village may exempt from application of its zoning regulations, property use regulations, building ordinances, electrical ordinances, and plumbing ordinances within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction, by action of the board of adjustment pursuant to sections 19-907 to 19-915 and any applicable ordinance, certain farm buildings when such structures are consistent with the comprehensive development plan, including anticipated long-range future growth based upon documented population and economic projections, as required by sections 19-907 to 19-915.

(b) For purposes of this subsection, farm building means a building utilized for agricultural purposes as defined in section 77-1359 on a farmstead of twenty acres or more which produces one thousand dollars or more of farm products each year.

(5)(a) A city of the second class or village shall provide written notice to the county board of the county in which the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city or village is located when proposing to adopt or amend a zoning ordinance which affects the extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of the city or village within such county. The written notice of the proposed change to the zoning ordinance shall be sent to the county board or its designee at least thirty days prior to the final decision by the city or village. The county board may submit comments or recommendations regarding the change in the zoning ordinance at the public hearings on the proposed change or directly to the city or village within thirty days after receiving such notice. The city or village may make its final decision (i) upon the expiration of the thirty days following the notice or (ii) when the county board submits comments or recommendations, if any, to the city or village prior to the expiration of the thirty days following the notice.

(b) Subdivision (5)(a) of this section does not apply to a city of the second class or a village (i) located in a county with a population in excess of one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent revised certified count by the United States Bureau of the Census or (ii) if the city or village and the county have a joint planning commission or joint planning department.

Laws 1957, c. 37, § 1, p. 204;

Laws 1967, c. 70, § 3, p. 232;

Laws 1967, c. 75, § 4, p. 244;

Laws 1983, LB 71, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 729, § 10;

Laws 2016, LB295, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB113, § 20;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 306;

Laws 2025, LB614, § 2.

Notwithstanding section 24-517, the district court has jurisdiction in injunctive actions to enforce zoning ordinances. Village of Springfield v. Hevelone, 195 Neb. 37, 236 N.W.2d 811 (1975).

Section empowers cities of the second class and villages to extend existing ordinances to the one-half mile area surrounding the municipal limits and authorize inclusion of this area in all future ordinances. City of Syracuse v. Farmers Elevator, Inc., 182 Neb. 783, 157 N.W.2d 394 (1968).